California statutes. Penal Code
 current theory, terminology, historical issues, and procedures necessary to appropriately respond to and effectively mitigate the effects of a terrorism incident. The training standards and course of instruction may, if appropriate, include coordination with emergency medical services providers that respond to an incident, tactical casualty care, and other standards of emergency care as established pursuant to Section 1799.50 of the Health and Safety Code by the Commission on Emergency Medical Services.

(b) The commission shall expedite the delivery of this training to
 law enforcement through maximum use of its local and regional delivery systems.

(c) To maximize the availability and delivery of training, the commission shall develop a course of instruction to train trainers and first responders dealing with terrorism incidents using a variety of formats.

(d) Every police chief and sheriff, the Commissioner of the Highway Patrol, and other general law enforcement agency executives may determine the members of their agency to receive the emergency response to terrorism incidents training developed by the commission under this section. The persons to be trained may include, but are not limited to, peace officers that perform general law enforcement duties at a managerial or supervisory level or below and are assigned to field duties.

(e) For purposes of this section, a “terrorism incident” includes, but is not limited to, an active shooter incident. An “active shooter incident” is an incident where an individual is actively engaged in killing or attempting to kill people.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 668, Sec. 6.   (AB 1598)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.14.

(a) The commission shall implement by January 1, 2007, a course or courses of instruction for the training of law enforcement officers in California in the handling of human trafficking complaints and also shall develop guidelines for law enforcement response to human trafficking. The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall stress the dynamics and manifestations of human trafficking, identifying and communicating with victims, providing documentation that satisfy the Law Enforcement Agency (LEA) endorsement required by federal law, collaboration with federal law enforcement officials, therapeutically appropriate investigative techniques, the availability of civil and immigration remedies and community resources, and protection of the victim. Where appropriate, the training presenters shall
 include human trafficking experts with experience in the delivery of direct services to victims of human trafficking. Completion of the course may be satisfied by telecommunication, video training tape, or other instruction.

(b) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means any officer or employee of a local police department or sheriff’s office, and any peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 830.2.

(c) The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, the standards for the training, and the guidelines shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of human trafficking.

(d) The commission, in consultation with these groups and
 individuals, shall review existing training programs to determine in what ways human trafficking training may be included as a part of ongoing programs.

(e) Every law enforcement officer who is assigned field or investigative duties shall complete a minimum of two hours of training in a course or courses of instruction pertaining to the handling of human trafficking complaints as described in subdivision (a) by July 1, 2014, or within six months of being assigned to that position, whichever is later.

(History: Amended November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.15.

The commission shall prepare guidelines establishing standard procedures which may be followed by law enforcement agencies in the investigation and reporting of cases involving anti-reproductive-rights crimes. In developing the guidelines, the commission shall consider recommendations 1 to 12, inclusive, 14, and 15 of the report prepared by the Department of Justice and submitted to the Legislature pursuant to the Reproductive Rights Law Enforcement Act (Title 5.7 (commencing with Section 13775)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 206, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Peace Officers’ Training Fund and Allocations Therefrom [13520. - 13526.3.]

13520.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a Peace Officers’ Training Fund, which is hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, exclusively for costs of administration and for grants to local governments and districts pursuant to this chapter. The fund is abolished on January 1, 2020, and any moneys remaining in the fund shall revert to the State Penalty Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Penalty Fund is the successor fund to the Peace Officers’ Training Fund. All assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenditures of the Peace Officers’ Training Fund shall be transferred to, and become a part of, the State Penalty Fund, as provided in Section 16346 of the Government Code. Any references in state
 law to the Peace Officers’ Training Fund shall be construed to refer to the State Penalty Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 25, Sec. 46.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13522.

Any city, county, city and county, district, or joint powers agency, that desires to receive state aid pursuant to this chapter shall make application to the commission for the aid. The initial application shall be accompanied by a certified copy of an ordinance, or in the case of the University of California, the California State University, and agencies not authorized to act by ordinance, by a resolution, adopted by its governing body providing that while receiving any state aid pursuant to this chapter, the city, county, city and county, district, or joint powers agency will adhere to the standards for recruitment and training established by the commission. The application shall contain any information the commission may
 request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 59, Sec. 9.   (SB 514)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13523.

(a) The commission shall annually allocate and the State Treasurer shall periodically pay from the State Penalty Fund, at intervals specified by the commission, to each city, county, district, or joint powers agency that has applied and qualified for aid pursuant to this chapter an amount determined by the commission pursuant to standards set forth in its regulations. The commission shall grant aid only on a basis that is equally proportionate among cities, counties, districts, and joint powers agencies. State aid shall only be provided for training expenses of full-time regularly paid employees, as defined by the commission, of eligible agencies from cities, counties, districts, or joint powers agencies.

(b) An allocation shall not be made
 to any city, county, district, or joint power agency that is not adhering to the standards established by the commission as applicable to that city, county, district, or joint powers agency.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 28.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13524.

Any county wishing to receive state aid pursuant to this chapter for the training of regularly employed and paid inspectors and investigators of a district attorney’s office, as defined in Section 830.1 who conduct criminal investigations, shall include such request for aid in its application to the commission pursuant to Sections 13522 and 13523.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 710, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13525.

Any city, county, city and county, district, or joint powers agency which desires to receive state aid pursuant to this chapter for the training of regularly employed and paid local public safety dispatchers, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 13510, shall include that request for aid in its application to the commission pursuant to Sections 13522 and 13523.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 333, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13526.

An allocation shall not be made from the State Penalty Fund, pursuant to this article, to a local government agency if the agency was not entitled to receive funding under any of the provisions of this article, as they read on December 31, 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 25, Sec. 47.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13526.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in adding this section that effect be given to amendments made by Chapter 950 of the Statutes of 1989. The Legislature recognizes those amendments were intended to make port wardens and special officers of the Harbor Department of the City of Los Angeles entitled to allocations from the State Penalty Fund for state aid pursuant to this chapter, notwithstanding the amendments made by Chapter 1165 of the Statutes of 1989, which added Section 13526 to this code.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13526, for the purposes of this chapter, the port wardens and special officers of the Harbor Department of the City of Los Angeles shall be entitled to receive funding from the State Penalty
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 25, Sec. 48.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13526.2.

Notwithstanding Section 13526, for the purposes of this chapter, the housing authority police departments of the City of Los Angeles and the City of Oakland shall be entitled to receive funding from the State Penalty Fund, pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 25, Sec. 49.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13526.3.

Notwithstanding Section 13526, for the purposes of this chapter, joint powers agencies formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall be entitled to receive funding from the State Penalty Fund, pursuant to this article. This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 25, Sec. 50.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Peace Officers [13540. - 13542.]

13540.

(a) Any person or persons desiring peace officer status under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 who, on January 1, 1990, were not entitled to be designated as peace officers under that chapter shall request the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training to undertake a feasibility study regarding designating that person or persons as peace officers. The request and study shall be undertaken in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission. The commission may charge any person requesting a study, a fee, not to exceed the actual cost of undertaking the study. Nothing in this article shall apply to or otherwise affect the authority of the Director of Corrections, the Director of the Youth Authority, the Director of the Youthful Offender Parole Board, or the Secretary of the Youth and Adult Correctional Agency to designate peace officers as provided for in Section 830.5.

(b) Any person or persons who are designated as peace officers under Chapter 4.5, (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, and who desire a change in peace officer designation or status, shall request the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training to undertake a study to assess the need for a change in designation or status. The request and study shall be undertaken in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission. The commission may charge any person, agency, or organization requesting a study, a fee, not to exceed the actual cost of undertaking the study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

13541.

(a) Any study undertaken under this article shall include, but shall not be limited to, the current and proposed duties and responsibilities of persons employed in the category seeking the designation change, their field law enforcement duties and responsibilities, their supervisory and management structure, and their proposed training methods and funding sources.

(b) A study undertaken pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13540 shall include, but shall not be limited to, the current and proposed duties and responsibilities of the persons employed in the category seeking the designation change and their field law enforcement duties and responsibilities, and the extent to which their current duties and responsibilities require additional peace officer powers and authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 96, Sec. 2.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

13542.

(a) In order for the commission to give a favorable recommendation as to a change in designation to peace officer status, the person or persons desiring the designation change shall be employed by an agency with a supervisory structure consisting of a chief law enforcement officer, the agency shall agree to comply with the training requirements set forth in Section 832, and shall be subject to the funding restriction set forth in Section 13526. The commission shall issue the study and its recommendations to the requesting person or agency within 18 months of the mutual acceptance of a contract between the requesting person or agency and the commission. A copy of that study and recommendations shall also be submitted to the Legislature.

(b) (1) In order for the commission to give a favorable recommendation as to a change in peace officer designation or status, the person or persons desiring the change in peace officer designation or status shall be employed by an agency that is currently participating in the Peace Officer Standard Training program.

(2) If the designation change is moving the person or persons into Section 830.1, the person or persons shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, set forth in Section 832.4.

(3) The commission shall issue the study and its recommendations, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 13540, to the requesting person or persons, within 12 months of the mutual acceptance of a contract between the requesting person or agency and the commission, or as soon as possible thereafter if the commission shows good cause as to the need for an extension of the 12-month time period.

(4) A copy of that study and recommendation shall also be submitted to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 96, Sec. 3.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Local Law Enforcement Accreditation [13550. - 13553.]

13550.

For the purposes of this article the following terms apply:

(a) “Local law enforcement” means city police and county sheriffs’ departments.

(b) “Accreditation” means meeting and maintaining standards that render the agency eligible for certification by ascribing to publicly recognized principles for the professional operation of local law enforcement agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1249, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13551.

(a) The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall develop regulations and professional standards for the law enforcement accreditation program when funding for this purpose from nongeneral funds is approved by the Legislature. The program shall provide standards for the operation of law enforcement agencies and shall be available as soon as practical after funding becomes available. The standards shall serve as a basis for the uniform operation of law enforcement agencies throughout the state to best serve the interests of the people of this state.

(b) The commission may, from time to time, amend the regulations and standards or adopt new standards relating to the accreditation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.

(a) Participation in this accreditation program is limited to police departments, sheriffs’ departments, and the California Highway Patrol. Other law enforcement agencies shall be eligible for accreditation after January 1, 1998.

(b) Participation shall be voluntary and shall be initiated upon the application of the chief executive officer of each agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 43, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13553.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit a law enforcement agency from establishing standards that exceed the minimum accreditation standards set by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1249, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4.5. COMMISSION ON CORRECTIONAL PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING [13600. - 13603.]

13600.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that peace officers of the state correctional system, including youth and adult correctional facilities, fulfill responsibilities that require creation and application of sound selection criteria for applicants and standards for their training prior to assuming their duties. For the purposes of this section, correctional peace officers are peace officers as defined in Section 830.5 and employed or designated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) The Legislature further finds that sound applicant selection and training are essential to public safety and in carrying out the missions of the Department of
 Corrections and Rehabilitation in the custody and care of the state’s offender population. The greater degree of professionalism which will result from sound screening criteria and a significant training curriculum will greatly aid the department in maintaining smooth, efficient, and safe operations and effective programs.

(b) There is within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation a Commission on Correctional Peace Officer Standards and Training, hereafter referred to, for purposes of this title, as the CPOST.

(c) (1) The executive board of the CPOST shall be composed of six voting members.

(A) Three members from, appointed by, and representing the management of, the Department of
 Corrections and Rehabilitation, one of whom shall represent the Division of Juvenile Justice until
 June 30, 2023, and the Division of Adult Parole Operations after June 30, 2023, or the Division of Rehabilitative Programs.

(B) Three members from, and appointed by the Governor upon recommendation by, and representing the membership of, the California Correctional Peace Officers’ Association. Two members shall be rank-and-file persons from State Bargaining Unit 6 and one member shall be supervisory.

(C) Appointments shall be for four years.

(D) Promotion of a member of the CPOST shall invalidate the appointment of that member and shall require the recommendation and appointment of a new member if the member was appointed from rank and file or from supervisory personnel and promoted out of their
 respective rank and file or supervisory position during their term on the CPOST.

(2) Each appointing authority shall appoint one alternate member for each regular member who it appoints pursuant to paragraph (1). Every alternate member shall possess the same qualifications as a regular member and shall substitute for, and vote in place of, a regular member who was appointed by the same appointing authority whenever a regular member is absent.

(d) The rules for voting on the executive board of the CPOST shall be as follows:

(1) Decisions shall be made by a majority vote.

(2) Proxy voting shall not be permitted.

(3) Tentative approval of a decision by the CPOST may be taken by a telephone vote. The CPOST members’ decision shall be documented in writing and submitted to the CPOST for confirmation at the next scheduled CPOST meeting so as to become a part of the permanent record.

(e) The executive board of the CPOST shall adopt rules as it deems necessary for efficient operations, including, but not limited to, the appointment of advisory members for forming whatever committees it deems necessary to conduct its business. These rules shall conform to the State Personnel Board’s rules and regulations, the Department of Human Resources’ rules and regulations, and the provisions of the State Bargaining Unit 6 memorandum of understanding.

(f) The executive board shall seek advice
 from national experts, including university and college institutions and correctional associations, on issues pertaining to adult corrections, juvenile justice, and the training of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation staff that are relevant to its mission. To this end, the executive board shall seek information from experts with the most specific knowledge concerning the subject matter.

(g) This section shall be operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 434, Sec. 19.   (SB 827)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13601.

(a) (1) The CPOST shall develop, approve, and monitor standards for the selection and training of state correctional peace officer apprentices. 

(2) Any standard for selection established under this subdivision shall be subject to approval by the Department of Human Resources. Using the psychological and screening standards approved by the Department of Human Resources, the Department of Human Resources or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall ensure that, prior to training, each applicant who has otherwise qualified in all physical and other testing requirements to be a peace officer the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, is determined to be free from emotional or mental
 conditions that might adversely affect the exercise of his or her duties and powers as a peace officer pursuant to the standards developed by CPOST.

(3) When developing, approving, and monitoring the standards for training of state correctional peace officer apprentices, the CPOST shall consider including additional training in the areas of mental health and rehabilitation, as well as coursework on the theory and history of corrections.

(b) The CPOST may approve standards for a course in the carrying and use of firearms for correctional peace officers that is different from that prescribed pursuant to Section 832. The standards shall take into consideration the different circumstances presented within the institutional setting from that presented to other law enforcement agencies outside the correctional setting.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 3078 of the Labor Code, the length of the probationary period for correctional peace officer apprentices shall be determined by the CPOST subject to approval by the State Personnel Board, pursuant to Section 19170 of the Government Code.

(d) The CPOST shall develop, approve, and monitor standards for advanced rank-and-file and supervisory state correctional peace officer and training programs for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. When a correctional peace officer is promoted within the department, he or she shall be provided with and be required to complete these secondary training experiences.

(e) The CPOST shall develop, approve, and monitor standards for the training of state correctional peace officers in the department in the handling of stress associated with their duties.

(f) Toward the accomplishment of the objectives of this section, the CPOST may confer with, and may avail itself of the assistance and recommendations of, other state and local agencies, boards, or commissions.

(g) Notwithstanding the authority of the CPOST, the department shall design and deliver training programs, shall conduct validation studies, and shall provide program support. The CPOST shall monitor program compliance by the department.

(h) The CPOST may disapprove any training courses created by the department pursuant to the standards developed by CPOST if it determines that the courses do not meet the prescribed standards. Training may continue with existing curriculum pending resolution.

(i) The CPOST shall annually submit an estimate of costs to
 conduct those inquiries and audits as may be necessary to determine whether the department and each of its institutions and parole regions are adhering to the standards developed by the CPOST, and shall conduct those inquiries and audits consistent with the annual Budget Act.

(j) The CPOST shall establish and implement procedures for reviewing and issuing decisions concerning complaints or recommendations from interested parties regarding the CPOST rules, regulations, standards, or decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 36.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13602.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall adhere to the training standards developed by CPOST at all locations where training is provided. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation training academy at Galt shall be known as the Richard A. McGee Academy. The training divisions, in using the funds, shall endeavor to minimize costs of administration so that a maximum amount of the funds will be used for providing training and support to correctional peace officers
 while being trained by the department.

(b) Each new cadet who attends an academy shall complete the course of training, pursuant to standards approved by the CPOST before they may be assigned to a post or job as a correctional peace officer. Commencing July 1, 2021, upon
 graduation from an academy, each new correctional officer shall complete new employee orientation and on-the-job observational training as negotiated and approved by the CPOST, totaling a minimum of 160 hours, before they may be assigned to a post as a correctional officer. Every newly appointed first-line or second-line supervisor in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall complete the course of training, pursuant to standards approved by the CPOST for that position.

(c) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide a minimum of two
 weeks of training to each newly appointed first-line supervisor and make every effort to provide training prior to commencement of supervisorial duties. If this training is not completed within six months of appointment to that position, any first-line or second-line supervisor shall not perform supervisory duties until the training is completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 23.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13602.1.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may establish a training academy for correctional peace officers in southern California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 39.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13603.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, until July 1, 2021, provide 520 hours of training to each correctional peace officer cadet. The department shall provide a minimum of 480 hours of training to each correctional
 peace officer cadet who commences training on or after
 July 1, 2021. This training shall be completed by the cadet prior to
 their assignment to a post or position as a correctional peace officer.

(b) The CPOST shall determine the on-the-job training requirements for correctional peace officers.

(c) Training standards previously established pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until training requirements are established by the CPOST
 pursuant to Section 13602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 24.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4.7. Law Enforcement Agency Regulations [13650. - 13670.]

13650.

Commencing January 1, 2020, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training and each local law enforcement agency shall conspicuously post on their internet websites all current standards, policies, practices, operating procedures, and education and training materials that would otherwise be available to the public if a request was made pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 350.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

13651.

(a) Every police department, sheriff’s office, or other entity that employs peace officers shall review the job description that is used in the recruitment and hiring of those peace officers and shall make changes that emphasize community-based policing, familiarization between law enforcement and community residents, and collaborative problem solving, while de-emphasizing the paramilitary aspects of the job.

(b) This section is not intended to alter the required duties of any peace officer.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that changes to these job descriptions are necessary to allow peace officers to feel like the public can trust law enforcement and to implement
 problem-solving policing and intelligence-led policing strategies in contrast with reactive policing strategies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 322, Sec. 3.   (AB 846)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13652.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents shall not be used by any law enforcement agency to disperse any assembly, protest, or demonstration.

(b) Kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents shall only be deployed by a peace officer that has received training on their proper use by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training for crowd control if the use is objectively reasonable to defend against a threat to life or serious bodily injury to any individual, including any peace officer, or to bring an objectively dangerous and unlawful situation safely and effectively under control, and only in accordance with
 all of the following requirements:

(1) De-escalation techniques or other alternatives to force have been attempted, when objectively reasonable, and have failed.

(2) Repeated, audible announcements are made announcing the intent to use kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents and the type to be used, when objectively reasonable to do so. The announcements shall be made from various locations, if necessary, and delivered in multiple languages, if appropriate.

(3) Persons are given an objectively reasonable opportunity to disperse and leave the scene.

(4) An objectively reasonable effort has been made to identify persons engaged in violent acts
 and those who are not, and kinetic energy projectiles or chemical agents are targeted toward those individuals engaged in violent acts. Projectiles shall not be aimed indiscriminately into a crowd or group of persons.

(5) Kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents are used only with the frequency, intensity, and in a manner that is proportional to the threat and objectively reasonable.

(6) Officers shall minimize the possible incidental impact of their use of kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents on bystanders, medical personnel, journalists, or other unintended targets.

(7) An objectively reasonable effort has been made to extract individuals in distress.

(8) Medical assistance is promptly provided, if properly trained personnel are present, or procured, for injured persons, when it is reasonable and safe to do so.

(9) Kinetic energy projectiles shall not be aimed at the head,
 neck, or any other vital organs.

(10) Kinetic energy projectiles or chemical agents shall not be used by any law enforcement agency solely due to any of the following:

(A) A violation of an imposed curfew.

(B) A verbal threat.

(C) Noncompliance with a law enforcement directive.

(11) If the chemical agent to be deployed is tear gas, only a commanding officer at the scene of the assembly, protest, or demonstration may authorize the use of tear gas.

(c) This section does not prevent a law enforcement agency from adopting
 more stringent policies.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Kinetic energy projectiles” means any type of device designed as less lethal, to be launched from any device as a projectile that may cause bodily injury through the transfer of kinetic energy and blunt force trauma. For purposes of this section, the term includes, but is not limited to, items commonly referred to as rubber bullets, plastic bullets, beanbag rounds, and foam tipped plastic rounds.

(2) “Chemical agents” means any chemical that can rapidly produce sensory irritation or disabling physical effects in humans, which disappear within a short time following termination of exposure. For
 purposes of this section, the term includes, but is not limited to, chloroacetophenone tear gas, commonly known as CN tear gas; 2-chlorobenzalmalononitrile gas, commonly known as CS gas; and items commonly referred to as pepper balls, pepper spray, or oleoresin capsicum.

(e) This section does not apply within any county detention facility or any correctional facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 60.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13652.1.

(a) Each law enforcement agency shall, within 60 days of each incident, publish a summary on its internet website of all instances in which a peace officer employed by that agency uses a kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent, as those terms are defined in Section 13652, for crowd control. However, an agency may extend that period for another 30 days if they demonstrate just cause, but in no case longer than 90 days from the time of the incident.

(b) For each incident reported under subdivision (a), the summary shall be limited to that information known to the agency at the time of the report and shall include only the following:

(1) A description of the assembly, protest, demonstration, or
 incident, including the approximate crowd size and the number of officers involved.

(2) The type of kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent deployed.

(3) The number of rounds or quantity of chemical agent dispersed, as applicable.

(4) The number of documented injuries as a result of the kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent deployment.

(5) The justification for using the kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent, including any de-escalation tactics or protocols and other measures that were taken at the time of the event to de-escalate tensions and avoid the necessity of using the kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent.

(c) The Department of Justice shall post on its internet website a compiled list linking each law enforcement agency’s reports posted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 61.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13653.

(a) A peace officer, as defined in Section 830, may request an alleged law enforcement officer to present identification when there is probable cause or reasonable suspicion to believe the alleged law enforcement officer has committed a crime, including, but not limited to, impersonating a peace officer in violation of subdivisions (a), (b), or (c), of Section 538d.

(b) For purposes of this section, “law enforcement officer” includes a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, and any federal law enforcement officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 9.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13654.

(a) A law enforcement officer operating in California that is not uniformed, and therefore is not required to clearly display identification pursuant to Section 830.10, shall visibly display identification that includes their agency and either a name or badge number
 or both name and badge number when performing their enforcement duties, unless expressly exempt under subdivision (b).

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An officer engaged in active undercover operations or investigative activities.

(2) An officer engaged in plainclothes operations who is employed within the California Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency, California Health and Human Services Agency, California Labor and Workforce Development Agency, California Natural Resources Agency, California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, California Transportation Agency, California Environmental Protection Agency, California Government Operations Agency, or within any department,
 board, commission, or other entity in those agencies or the federal equivalents of these state agencies.

(3) An officer wearing personal protective equipment that prevents display.

(4) Exigent circumstances, involving an imminent danger to persons or property, or the escape of a perpetrator, or the destruction of evidence, including if the officer is responding to those circumstances while off-duty.

(5) An officer assigned to Special Weapons and Tactics (SWAT) or tactical team units and actively performing their SWAT or tactical team responsibilities.

(6) An officer engaged in protective operations involving elected officials, judicial officers, or other designated dignitaries where the display of identification would compromise the safety, anonymity,
 or tactical effectiveness of the protection detail.

(c) A willful and knowing violation of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(d) For the purposes of this section,
 the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Enforcement duties” means active and planned operations involving the arrest or detention of an individual, or deployment for crowd control purposes.

(2) “Law enforcement officer” means a peace officer as defined in Section 830, and any
 federal law enforcement officer.

(e) This section, and the penalties established herein, shall not apply to any law enforcement agency, or its personnel, if that agency maintains and publicly posts a written policy pursuant to Section 7288 of the Government Code.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 10.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13655.

(a) A department or agency that employs peace officers shall not authorize or allow its employees to wear a uniform that is substantially similar to any uniform of the United States Armed Forces or state active militia.
